California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 completed pursuant to Section 52 of Chapter 171 of the Statutes of 2001, the department, in consultation with the entities named in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), shall implement the recommendations from the study, to the extent feasible and appropriate.

(e) (1) In order to assist the department in formulating the state plan amendments required to implement this section, the department shall regularly consult with the LEA Ad Hoc Workgroup, consisting of, but not limited to, representatives of the State Department of Education, LEAs, including urban, rural, large and small school districts, and county offices of education, and local education consortia. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department also consult with staff from Region IX of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, experts
 from the fields of both health and education, and state legislative staff.

(2) The department shall ensure that any LEA participating in the Medi-Cal Billing Option program may participate virtually in any trainings or stakeholder meetings, including those meetings conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, or any other contrary state requirement, the department shall take whatever action is necessary to ensure that, to the extent there is capacity in its certified match, an LEA shall be reimbursed retroactively for the maximum period allowed by the federal government for any department change that results in an increase in reimbursement to LEA providers.

(g) The department may undertake all
 necessary activities to recoup matching funds from the federal government for reimbursable services that have already been provided in the state’s public schools. The department shall prepare and take whatever action is necessary to implement all regulations, policies, state plan amendments, and other requirements necessary to achieve this purpose.

(h) The department shall, on or before December 31 of each year, file with the Legislature, and publish on its internet website, an annual report that shall include at least all of the following:

(1) A copy of the annual comparison required by subdivision (m).

(2) A state-by-state comparison of school-based Medicaid total and per eligible child claims and federal
 revenues. The comparison shall include a review of the most recent two years for which completed data is available.

(3) A summary of department activities, including training for LEAs, and an explanation of how each activity contributed toward narrowing the gap between California’s per eligible student federal fund recovery and the per student recovery of the top three states.

(4) A listing of all school-based services, activities, and providers approved for reimbursement by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in other state plans that are not yet approved for reimbursement in California’s state plan and the service unit rates approved for reimbursement.

(5) The official recommendations made to the
 department by the entities named in subdivision (e) and the action taken by the department regarding each recommendation.

(6) A one-year timetable for state plan amendments and other actions necessary to obtain reimbursement for those items listed in paragraph (4).

(7) Identification of any barriers to LEA reimbursement, including those specified by the entities named in subdivision (e), that are not imposed by federal requirements, and a description of the actions that have been, and will be, taken to eliminate them.

(8) (A) A statewide summary of financial findings related to the process identified in the program guide for the most recently completed audited state fiscal year. The summary of
 findings shall be updated in subsequent years until all filed CRCS reports have been audited.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the “most recently completed audited state fiscal year” means the most recent state fiscal year where 70 percent or more of the filed CRCSs have been audited.

(C) A description of changes to the cost settlement process that shall include all of the following:

(i) A summary of the number of audits conducted of Medi-Cal Billing Option program CRCSs.

(ii) A summary of the difference between interim reimbursement and the CRCSs.

(iii) A summary related to
 audit findings of noncompliance.

(i) The department shall provide semiannual Medi-Cal Billing Option billing forums to LEAs to provide guidance on appropriate billing practices.

(j) The department shall make targeted technical assistance available to LEAs that experience a 25 percent or greater difference between their submitted cost report and the final audited settlement, including assisting LEAs to understand the actions needed to reduce differences between submitted cost reports and the final audited settlement.

(k) (1) The department’s administration of the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option program shall be funded and staffed by proportionately reducing federal Medicaid payments allocable to LEAs
 for the provision of benefits funded by the federal Medicaid program under the billing option for services by LEAs. Moneys collected as a result of the reduction in federal Medicaid payments allocable to LEAs shall be deposited into the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Recovery Fund, which is hereby established in the Special Deposit Fund established pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code. These funds shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only to support the department to meet all the requirements of administering the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option program. If at any time this section is repealed, it is the intent of the Legislature that all funds in the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Recovery Fund be returned proportionally to all LEAs whose federal Medicaid funds were used to create this fund. The annual amount withheld pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed 5
 percent of total Medicaid payments allocable to LEAs for the provision of benefits funded by the federal Medicaid program under the billing option for services by LEAs.

(2) Moneys collected under paragraph (1) shall be proportionately reduced from federal Medicaid payments to all participating LEAs so that no one LEA loses a disproportionate share of its federal Medicaid payments.

(l) (1) The department may enter into a sole source contract to comply with the requirements of this section.

(2) The level of additional staff to comply with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, staff for which the department has contracted for pursuant to paragraph (1), shall be limited
 to that level that can be funded with revenues derived pursuant to subdivision (i).

(m) The activities of the department shall include all of the following:

(1) An annual comparison of the school-based Medicaid systems in comparable states.

(2) Efforts to improve communications with the federal government, the State Department of Education, and LEAs.

(3) The development and updating of written guidelines to LEAs regarding best practices to avoid audit exceptions, as needed.

(4) The establishment and maintenance of an LEA user-friendly, interactive internet website.

(5) Collaboration with the State Department of Education to help ensure LEA compliance with state and federal Medicaid requirements and to help improve LEA participation in the Medi-Cal Billing Option for LEAs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 492, Sec. 17.   (SB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14116.

The director of a county agency which administers the provisions of this chapter and also administers medical facilities may not delegate to an employee the decision to authorize or deny aid under this chapter, if he has also delegated authority to that employee to operate or participate in the operation of any such medical facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14117.

Information relating to the medication provided to Medi-Cal recipients, shall be disclosed by the department or its agents, to physicians who are treating those same recipients as patients, upon request of the treating physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1327.)
-------------------------------------------

14119.

The director shall employ sufficient consultants to assure compliance with the provisions of this code and the regulations, and the protection of the best interests of the state, and no county shall employ such consultants. However, if the director finds that it is not reasonable in specific cases to transfer to state employment a consultant employed by a county and that the consultant function is being performed according to statewide standards, he may authorize the county to continue to provide that particular consultant service.

As used in this section, a “consultant” means a person who reviews the procedures, charges and
 services of providers under this chapter, and who grants prior authorizations to providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14120.

(a) At the beginning of each fiscal year, for the current fiscal year, the director shall establish a monthly schedule of anticipated total payments and anticipated payments for categories of services, according to the categories established in the Governor’s Budget. The schedule will be revised quarterly. 

(b) The director shall report actual total payments and payments for categories of services, as set forth in subdivision (a), monthly to the Director of Finance and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(c) At any time during the fiscal year, if the director has reason to believe that the total cost of the program will exceed available funds, the director may first modify the method or amount of payment for services provided that no amount shall be reduced more than 10 percent and no modification will conflict with federal law. If such modification is not sufficient to bring the program within available funds, the director may postpone elective services in the schedule of benefits. Such postponement of elective services shall be accomplished by changing the standards for approval of requests for prior authorizations. Such changes shall be designed to insure that those recipients most in need of elective services receive them first within the funds available, but that no particular service is completely eliminated.

(d) At any time during the fiscal year, if the total amounts paid
 since the beginning of the fiscal year exceed by 10 percent the amounts scheduled, the director shall immediately institute the action set forth in subdivision (c).

(e) At any time during the fiscal year, if the total amounts paid for any category of service exceeds by 10 percent the amounts scheduled (other than services for which the method or amount of payment is prescribed by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act), the director shall modify the method or amount of payment for such category of service to assure that the total amount paid for such category of service in the fiscal year shall be less than 10 percent in excess of the total amount scheduled provided the total cost of the program to the State General Fund shall not exceed appropriated state general funds.

(f) Before any of the above actions
 are taken by the director, he or she shall consult with representatives of concerned provider groups.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) or (e), the director shall not reduce the amount of payment, under the circumstances described in subdivision (c) or (e), for the ingredient cost component of pharmaceutical services rendered by pharmacist providers in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1444, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

14122.

The department may provide, by regulation and consistent with the requirements of the Federal Social Security Act, for the care and treatment, or both, of persons eligible for medical assistance pursuant to Sections 14005.1, 14005. 4, and 14005.7 by providers in another state in those cases where out-of-state care or treatment is rendered on an emergency basis or is otherwise in the best interests of the person under the circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14123.

Participation in the Medi-Cal program by a provider of service is subject to suspension in order to protect the health of the recipients and the funds appropriated to carry out this chapter.

(a) (1) The director may suspend a provider of service from further participation under the Medi-Cal program for violation of any provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) or any rule or regulation promulgated by the director pursuant to those chapters. The suspension may be for an indefinite or specified period of time and with or without conditions, or may be imposed with the operation of the suspension stayed or probation granted. The director shall suspend a provider of
 service for conviction of any felony or any misdemeanor involving fraud, abuse of the Medi-Cal program or any patient, or otherwise substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a provider of service.

(2) If the provider of service is a clinic, group, corporation, or other association, conviction of any officer, director, or shareholder with a 10 percent or greater interest in that organization, of a crime described in paragraph (1) shall result in the suspension of that organization and the individual convicted if the director believes that suspension would be in the best interest of the Medi-Cal program. If the provider of service is a political subdivision of the state or other government agency, the conviction of the person in charge of the facility of a crime described in paragraph (1) may result in the suspension of that
 facility. The record of conviction or a certified copy thereof, certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge in whose court the conviction is had, shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred. A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(3) After conviction, but before the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, the director, if they believe that suspension would be in the best interests of the Medi-Cal program, may order the suspension of a provider of service. When the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence irrespective of any
 subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing a person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment, the director shall order the suspension of a provider of service. The suspension shall not take effect earlier than the date of the director’s order. Suspension following a conviction is not subject to the proceedings required in subdivision (c). However, the director may grant an informal hearing at the request of the provider of service to determine in the director’s sole discretion if the circumstances surrounding the conviction justify rescinding or otherwise modifying the suspension provided for in this subdivision.

(4) If the provider of service appeals the conviction and the conviction
 is reversed, the provider may apply for reinstatement to the Medi-Cal program after the conviction is reversed. Notwithstanding Section 14124.6, the application for reinstatement shall not be subject to the one-year waiting period for the filing of a reinstatement petition pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Whenever the director receives written notification from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services that a physician or other individual practitioner has been suspended from participation in the Medicare or Medicaid programs, the director shall promptly suspend the practitioner from participation in the Medi-Cal program and notify the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation of the suspension, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).
 This automatic suspension is not subject to the proceedings required in subdivision (c). No payment from state or federal funds may be made for any item or service rendered by the practitioner during the period of suspension.

(2) If the practitioner suspended from participation in the Medicare Program or Medicaid program is a participant in the Medi-Cal program, the director may request a waiver as permitted by federal law, including, but not limited to, Section 1320a-7(d)(3)(B)(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code if the suspension was based solely on conduct that is not
 deemed to be unprofessional conduct under California law. The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this paragraph. This paragraph shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals and federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (2), in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or similar written instructions. 

(c) The proceedings for suspension shall be conducted
 pursuant to Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code. The director may temporarily suspend any provider of service prior to any hearing when in their opinion that action is necessary to protect the public welfare or the interests of the Medi-Cal program. The director shall notify the provider of service of the temporary suspension and the effective date thereof and at the same time serve the provider with an accusation. The accusation and all proceedings thereafter shall be in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon receipt of a notice of defense by the provider, the director shall set the matter for hearing within 30 days after receipt of the notice. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until such time as the hearing is completed and the director has made a final determination on the merits. The temporary suspension shall, however, be deemed vacated if the director
 fails to make a final determination on the merits within 60 days after the original hearing has been completed. This subdivision does not apply where the suspension of a provider is based upon the conviction of any crime involving fraud, abuse of the Medi-Cal program, or suspension from the federal Medicare Program. In those instances, suspension shall be automatic.

(d) (1) The suspension by the director of any provider of service shall preclude the provider from submitting claims for payment, either personally or through claims submitted by any clinic, group, corporation, or other association to the Medi-Cal program for any services or
 supplies the provider has provided under the program, except for services or supplies provided prior to the suspension. No clinic, group, corporation, or other association which is a provider of service shall submit claims for payment to the Medi-Cal program for any services or supplies provided by a person within the organization who has been suspended or revoked by the
 director, except for services or supplies provided prior to the suspension.

(2) If the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or the regulations promulgated by the director are violated by a provider of service that is a clinic, group, corporation, or other association, the director may suspend the organization and any individual person within the organization who is responsible for the violation.

(e) (1) Notice of the suspension shall be sent by the director to the provider’s state licensing, certifying, or registering authority, along with the evidence upon which the suspension was based.

(2) At the same time notice is provided pursuant to paragraph (1),
 the director shall provide written notification of the suspension to the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation, for purposes of Section 139.21 of the Labor Code.

(f) In addition to the bases for suspension contained in subdivisions (a) and (b), the director may suspend a provider of service from further participation under the Medi-Cal dental program for the provision of services that are below or less than the standard of acceptable quality, as established by the California Dental Association Guidelines for the Assessment of Clinical Quality and Professional Performance, Copyright 1995, Third Edition, as periodically amended. The suspension shall be subject to the requirements contained in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 261, Sec. 5.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14123.05.

The department shall develop, in consultation with provider representatives, including, but not limited to, physician, pharmacy, and medical supplies providers, a process that enables a provider to meet and confer with the appropriate department officials after the issuance of a letter notifying the provider of a payment suspension, pursuant to Section 14107.11, or a temporary suspension, pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 14043.36, for the purpose of presenting and discussing information and evidence that may impact the department’s decision to modify or terminate the sanction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 797, Sec. 25.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14123.1.

Subdivision (a) of Section 14123 as added by Section 2 of Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 1969 does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the preexisting law, and shall be construed merely as providing a specific statutory basis for suspension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

14123.2.

Any provider or person that presents or causes to be presented a claim for services to an officer, employee, or agent of the state, or of any department or agency thereof as defined in appropriate state law, that the director determines is for a medical or other item or service that the person knows or has reason to know; (a) was not provided as claimed, or (b) payment for which may not be made under the program in the following instances: (1) when the person or provider has been suspended from participation in the program, or (2) when the department
 determines that the services or items claimed are substantially in excess of the needs of individuals or are of a quality that fails to meet professionally recognized standards of health care, or (3) when the department determines that a person has demonstrated a pattern of abusive overbilling of the program, or (4) when the department determines that a person has intentionally or negligently made a false statement or representation on any request for payment submitted to the Medi-Cal program; or (c) is submitted in violation of an agreement between the person and the state, shall be subject in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, to a civil money penalty of not more than three times the amount claimed for each item or service. For continuing intentional violations, a civil money penalty of not more than three times the amount claimed for each item or service may be imposed for each day the violation continues.

The director shall make the
 determination to assess civil money penalties and shall be responsible for the collection of the penalty amounts.

The provider or person subjected to a civil money penalty may appeal any decision by the director to assess the penalty pursuant to Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all money collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the General Fund on a monthly basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 37.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14123.25.

(a) In lieu of, or in addition to, the imposition of any other sanction available to it, including the sanctions and penalties authorized under Section 14123.2 or 14171.6, and as the “single state agency” for California vested with authority to administer the Medi-Cal program, the department shall exercise the authority granted to it in Section 1002.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and may also impose the mandatory and permissive exclusions identified in Section 1128 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 1320a-7), and its implementing regulations, and impose civil penalties identified in Section 1128A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320a-7a), and its implementing regulations, against applicants and providers, as defined in Section 14043.1, or against billing agents, as defined in Section 14040.1. The department may also terminate, or refuse to enter into, a provider agreement authorized under Section 14043.2 with an applicant or provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, upon the grounds specified in Section 1866(b)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395cc(b)(2)). Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code or any other provision of law, any appeal by an applicant, provider, or billing agent of the imposition of a civil penalty, exclusion, or other sanction pursuant to this subdivision shall be in accordance with Section 14043.65, except that where the action is based upon a conviction for any crime involving fraud or abuse of the Medi-Cal, Medicaid, or
 Medicare programs, or an exclusion by the federal government from the Medicaid or Medicare programs, the action shall be automatic and not subject to appeal or hearing.

(b) In addition, the department may impose the intermediate sanctions identified in Section 1846 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-2), and its implementing regulations, against any provider that is a clinical laboratory, as defined in Section 1206 of the Business and Professions Code. The imposition and appeal of this intermediate sanction shall be in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 1065) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) (1) In addition, the department may issue a written warning notice of improper billing or improper cost report computation, which shall specifically identify the statute, regulation, or rule
 that is being violated, to a provider via certified mail, return receipt requested, whenever a review of the provider’s paid claims or a provider’s cost report demonstrates a pattern of improper billing or improper cost report computation. The review shall not take into account claims that were denied or payment reductions. The warning notice shall be in a format that specifically apprises the provider of the item or service improperly billed and, if applicable, the deficiencies in the manner in which provider costs were computed. The warning notice may be issued with annual cost report audit findings, or in addition to any audit or any other action that the department is authorized to take. The failure of the department to exercise its discretion to issue the warning notice shall not limit its authority to audit or take any action authorized by law. The warning notice shall provide the provider with the opportunity to contest the warning notice and explain to the department the correctness of the provider’s
 bill or cost report computation. If the department accepts the provider’s explanation, in whole or in part, no further action related to the notice or part of the notice that the department accepts as correct shall be taken pursuant to this section.

(2) Civil money penalties may be imposed in the following circumstances:

(A) If a provider presents or causes to be presented claims for payment by the Medi-Cal program that are:

(i) Billed improperly, and are for a service or item about which the provider has received two or more warning notices of improper billing, the provider may, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, be subject to a civil money penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per claim, or up to two times the amount improperly claimed for each item or service, whichever is
 greater.

(ii) For a service or item for which the department solicits provider costs for use in calculating Medi-Cal reimbursement or in calculating and assigning Medi-Cal reimbursement rates, the cost reports relevant to the claims are improperly calculated, and the provider has received two or more warning notices of improper cost report computation regarding substantially similar errors, the provider may, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, be subject to a civil money penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per adjustment by the department to the costs submitted by the provider, or up to two times the amount improperly claimed for each item or service, whichever is greater.

(B) If a provider presents or causes to be presented claims for payment by the Medi-Cal program that are:

(i) Billed improperly, and are for a service or item about which the provider has received three or more warning notices of improper billing, or has been assessed a penalty under subparagraph (A), the provider may, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, be subject to a civil money penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per claim, or up to three times the amount improperly claimed for each item or service, whichever is greater.

(ii) For a service or item for which the department solicits provider costs for use in calculating Medi-Cal reimbursement or in calculating and assigning Medi-Cal reimbursement rates, and the cost reports relevant to the claims are improperly calculated, and the provider has received three or more warning notices of improper cost report computation regarding substantially similar errors, or has been assessed a penalty under subparagraph (A), the provider may, in addition to any
 other penalties that may be prescribed by law, be subject to a civil money penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per adjustment by the department to the costs submitted by the provider, or three times the amount claimed for each item or service, whichever is greater.

(3) Any provider subjected to civil money penalties under paragraph (2) may appeal the decision to assess penalties pursuant to Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 227.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.

Notice of any suspension under Section 14123, along with any information obtained as a result of the director’s investigation shall be sent by the director to the appropriate state licensing, certifying or registering authority. The director may in any event provide information obtained as a result of its investigation to such appropriate state agency at any time.

Nothing contained in this section shall limit the state licensing, certifying or registering authority’s power to conduct at any time independent investigations and proceedings concerning the revocation or suspension of any person’s license, certificate or registration. No
 action taken by the state licensing, certifying, or registering authority shall have any effect upon a suspension under Section 14123.

The word “suspension” as used in this section shall mean a final suspension after all administrative and judicial remedies are exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1386.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.1.

Each provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, of health care services rendered under the Medi-Cal program or any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors, shall keep and maintain records of each service rendered under the Medi-Cal program or any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors, the beneficiary or person to whom rendered, the date the service was rendered, and any additional information as the department may by regulation require. Records required to be kept and maintained under this section shall be retained by the provider for a period of 10 years from the final date of the contract period between the plan and the provider,
 from the date of completion of any audit, or from the date the service was rendered, whichever is later, in accordance with Section 438.3(u) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 25.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.2.

(a) (1) During normal working hours, the department may make any examination of the books and records of, and may visit and inspect the premises or facilities of, those identified in paragraphs (2) and (3), that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) and regulations adopted thereunder, or the law under which the department or its agents or contractors administer any other health care program.

(2) Any applicant or provider, as defined in Section 14043.1, pertaining to services, goods, supplies, or merchandise rendered or supplied, directly or indirectly, or to be rendered or supplied, directly or indirectly, to any beneficiary under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(3) Any person or entity that provides services, goods, supplies, or merchandise, directly or indirectly, under, or seeks reimbursement from, any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(b) (1) Applicants, providers, or others receiving or seeking reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program or other health care programs administered by the department or its agents or contractors shall furnish information or copies of records and documentation upon request by the department. Unannounced visits to request
 this information shall be reserved for those exceptional situations where arrangement of an appointment beforehand is clearly not possible or is clearly inappropriate to the nature of the intended visit. Only those related books and records of each service rendered, the beneficiary to whom rendered, the date, and additional information as the department may by regulation require shall be subject to the requirement of furnishing copies. This information may include records to support and document the recipient’s eligibility for services and, to the extent necessary, records to provide proof of the quantity and receipt of the services, and that the services were provided by proper personnel. Providers and others subject to this section shall be reimbursed for reasonable photocopying-related expenses as determined by the department. Failure to comply with the requests for information or records made pursuant to this section shall be grounds for immediate suspension of the provider or others subject to this
 section under subdivision (b) of Section 14123 or under the other health care programs administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(2) Any copies furnished pursuant to this section shall be used only to investigate and pursue criminal, civil, or administrative sanctions for Medi-Cal fraud or abuse, including the provision of dental services that are below or less than the standard of acceptable quality as prescribed by subdivision (f) of Section 14123, or fraud or abuse under any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors and the copies shall be destroyed when that purpose has been satisfied. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the referral of investigative findings, including copies of books and records, to the appropriate federal, state, or local licensing, certifying, regulatory, or prosecutorial authority.

(c) For purposes of this section and Section 14124.1, “provider” shall be defined as follows:

(1) “Provider” shall have the meaning contained in Section 14043.1.

(2) “Provider” shall also include any person or entity under contract with the provider, as defined in paragraph (1), to assist in the application process or eligibility determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.3.

Notice of any act of the department required by law or department regulation to be given may be signed and given by the director or an authorized employee of the department and may be made personally or by mail. If made by mail, service shall be made in the manner prescribed by Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In the case of service by mail, the service is complete at the time of deposit in the United States Post Office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.4.

The director may on his own motion at any time before a suspension is placed into effect and without further proceedings, review the penalty against a provider, but such review shall be limited to reduction of such penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.5.

(a) The director may, in accordance with Section 10725, adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, and to enable the department to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred upon it by this chapter, not inconsistent with any
 statute of this state.

(b) All regulations previously adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services or any predecessor department pursuant to this chapter and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the director in accordance with Section 10725.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 25.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.6.

In the event the director orders that oral argument or a hearing be held upon a petition for reinstatement or reduction of penalty filed pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code, he or she may hear and decide the matter himself or herself or may, in his or her discretion, either (1) sit and hear the matter with an administrative law judge assigned by the department or (2) assign the matter to an administrative law judge assigned by the department who shall proceed in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, and who shall prepare a
 proposed decision for the department for action pursuant to Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 38.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14124.7.
